Wyoming statutes. Title 21 Education
Article 3. State Financial Support
§ 21-13-309.
Determination of amount to be included in foundation program for each district.

through (f) Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 304.

through (j) Repealed by Laws 1993, ch. 168, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1997 Special Session, ch. 3, § 304.

In determining the amount to be included in the foundation program for each district, the state superintendent shall:

through (iii) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Based upon reports from each district on schools operating within that district for the current school year and on grade configurations contained within each reported school during that school year, compute the average daily membership (ADM) for each reported school and each grade within each reported school in accordance with identified grade configurations subject to the following:

If the district’s average ADM for the three (3) immediately preceding school years is greater than the district’s ADM from the previous school year, each reported school shall be computed based upon the average of the school’s ADM counts completed at the end of the three (3) immediately preceding school years, otherwise each reported school within the district shall be computed based on the school’s ADM for the previous school year;

For each school year, the configuration of grades for each school shall be based upon the ADM reported for each grade in which students were enrolled for the immediately preceding school year;

Repealed by Laws 2012, ch. 99, § 2.

Based upon ADM computations and identified school configurations within each district pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection, compute the foundation program amount for each district as prescribed by the education resource block grant model adopted by the Wyoming legislature as defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv), as contained within the spreadsheets and accompanying reports referenced under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii). The following criteria shall be used by the state superintendent in the administration of the education resource block grant model:

At-risk students, for purposes of model computations, shall include students within a school who are eligible for participation in the free and reduced price lunch program under the national school lunch program established by 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., who are identified as limited English proficiency in accordance with rules and regulations of the department of education or who are mobile students as defined by department rule and regulation and enrolled in grades six (6) through twelve (12) for the applicable school year. A student shall be counted only once for purposes of computing school at-risk student populations even though that student may simultaneously be eligible to participate in the free and reduced price lunch program, in programs serving students with limited English proficiency or is defined as a mobile student;

Alternative schools qualifying for separate consideration under the education resource block grant model may be established by a school district for offering educational programs to students with educational needs which the district finds are not appropriately met by other schools in the district, excluding charter schools established under W.S.

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

. Alternative schools included within a district’s configuration of schools identified under paragraph (iv) of this subsection shall for purposes of the education resource block grant model:

Be approved as an alternative school by the department of education prior to July 1, 2006;

Repealed by Laws 2007, ch. 147, § 102.

Unless otherwise authorized by the state superintendent, be restricted to not more than one (1) alternative school within any school district;

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (V) of this subparagraph, on and after July 1, 2014, and if not qualifying under subdivision (I) of this subparagraph, be approved by the state superintendent subject to the following:

Completion of a formal evaluation of the school district’s at-risk programs to ensure provision of a continuum of learning supports and classroom interventions addressing the needs of at-risk children within the district which is comprised of the following:

a.

Criteria for identifying at-risk students in accordance with and subject to research-based indicators;

b.

Use of individual learning plans for each identified at-risk student or an equivalent school-wide plan that defines interventions, programs and services required to address special needs. The plans shall be continuously monitored by the district;

c.

Use of quality learning supports and classroom interventions based upon the special needs of the student population served by the district and the supports and interventions are supported by and based upon research-based practices and strategies;

d.

Data based predictors to identify students at-risk of dropping out of school after reaching the age of compulsory attendance pursuant to W.S.

21-4-102

and learning supports and classroom strategies to address this student population.

A formal evaluation is conducted by the district not less than once every two (2) years of the school’s programs, comprised of the continuum of learning supports and classroom interventions specified under subdivision (IV)(1) of this subparagraph. The evaluation shall measure the effectiveness of the school’s programs in meeting the needs of those student populations attending the school. Formal evaluations conducted under this subparagraph shall be reported to and approved by the district board and reported to the state superintendent together with action plans addressing necessary program improvements;

Student achievement within the school is reported annually by the district to the state superintendent, as measured by quality indicators specified by rule and regulation of the department which reflect the components of the continuum of learning supports and classroom interventions specified under subdivision (IV)(1) of this subparagraph;

Educational space for the school is provided through facilities operated and maintained by the district and approved by the state construction department as meeting statewide adequacy standards. After two (2) evaluations by the state superintendent under subdivision (IV)(3) of this subparagraph that demonstrate academic progress or success of an alternative school’s educational program, the alternative school shall be included in the district’s five (5) year plan under W.S.

21-15-116

and the school’s long-term facility needs shall be evaluated by the state construction department. Notwithstanding subparagraph (m)(vi)(C) of this section, the state construction department shall not approve any district plan which includes educational space for the alternative school within a separate facility unless the district provides sufficient documentation and evidence that the school cannot be collocated within a facility containing educational space for another school with similar grade configurations operated by the district.

Not be included for purposes of the block grant model if established on or after March 15, 2017 and before June 30, 2019. No new alternative school shall be approved by the department on and after March 15, 2017 and before July 1, 2019.

Salaries for all school and district level staffing categories, including teachers, principals and assistant principals, central office administrators, secretarial and clerical staff, operations and maintenance staff and aides and media technicians, shall be based upon average statewide salary levels calibrated under “Attachment A” for each staffing category, adjusted under subsection (o) of this section, including the experience, education and responsibility level as appropriate and as computed for each staffing category. The statewide average for each staffing category shall be adjusted for each district based upon the district experience, education and responsibility level relative to the statewide average for that category. District experience, education and responsibility level by appropriate staffing category shall be updated each year such that district adjustments reflect the prior school year staffing information. The district adjusted average salary for each staffing category shall be further adjusted for regional cost differences as measured by the greater of the hedonic wage index or the Wyoming cost-of-living index computed by the division of economic analysis, department of administration and information, with a minimum of one hundred (100) index value, as prescribed by the education resource block grant model. For purposes of the education resource block grant model, the version of the Wyoming cost-of-living index used by the division shall be based upon the unrecalibrated housing cost index weights unless otherwise determined by the legislature based upon recommendation of the joint education interim committee. In addition, the version of the Wyoming cost-of-living index applied under this subparagraph for any school year shall be the average of the six (6) consecutive semi-annual index reports completed by January 1 of the immediately preceding school year;

Career and technical education computations within the education resource block grant model shall be based upon:

The number of students enrolled in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) participating in career and technical education programs on a full-time equivalency (FTE) basis, as computed in accordance with guidelines established by the department of education;

Career and technical education programs offered in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) consisting of a sequence of three (3) or more career and technical courses in an occupational area or career cluster that provides students with the technical knowledge, skills or proficiencies necessary to obtain employment in current or emerging occupations or to pursue advanced skill training. To qualify under this subdivision, a career and technical course shall be offered pursuant to W.S. 21-9-101(b)(i)(J) and aligned with state content and performance standards prescribed by the state board of education under W.S. 21-2-304(a)(iii), and except as provided under W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxvii), shall be provided by a teacher certified by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board for the career and technical subject area associated with the course;

The number of full-time equivalent (FTE) vocational education teachers within the school, as computed in accordance with guidelines prescribed by the department, providing career and technical education instruction in grades nine (9) through twelve (12) and except as provided under W.S. 21-2-202(a)(xxvii), certified by the Wyoming professional teaching standards board to provide instruction at the high school level for career and technical education courses comprising career and technical education programs. Nothing in this subdivision shall require a district to employ teachers certified for high school career and technical education instruction on a full-time basis or to require teachers to teach only high school career and technical education courses on a full-time basis.

Amounts computed under the education resource block grant model for each school district based upon amounts generated by each school within the district and based upon amounts generated at the district level for that district within the block grant model, shall be adjusted by adding the following amounts:

An amount for district transportation of school children as provided under W.S.

21-13-320

;

An amount for district special education programs and services as provided under W.S.

21-13-321

;

An amount for any extra compensation payments to district teachers as provided under W.S.

21-13-324

;

An amount for any isolation and maintenance payments by the district as provided under W.S.

21-4-401

;

An amount for any tuition and maintenance payments made by the district pursuant to W.S. 21-4-501(d) and

21-4-504

.

Amounts provided within the model for health insurance shall be based upon:

Prior year statewide average district weighted actual participation in district health insurance plans as to the proportion of employee only, split contracts, employee plus spouse or children and family coverage;

The annualized state contribution rate as of January 1 of the preceding school year, on behalf of each employee and official enrolled in the state group health insurance plan, for employee only, split contracts, employee plus spouse or children and family coverage except as provided in subdivision (III) of this subparagraph; and

For school year 2020–2021 and school year 2021–2022, the amount provided to a school district for health insurance shall be calculated using the annualized state contribution rate as of January 1, 2019 for employee only, split contracts, employee plus spouse or children and family coverage based on district weighted actual participation in district health insurance plans for the 2018–2019 school year, plus additional funding as calculated pursuant to 2020 Senate File 0001, Section 334(b) as enacted into law.

Amounts within the block grant model for maintenance and operations shall be based upon actual gross square footage of school buildings and facilities subject to the following:

Actual gross square footage of school buildings and facilities shall be separated into education and noneducation space categories by school and by district, including leased square footage but excluding square footage not used for delivering the required educational program and the square footage of any building or facility closed and not operational as provided under W.S. 21-15-109(c)(iv);

Actual gross square footage of education space shall be the gross square footage prescribed by statewide building adequacy standards promulgated pursuant to W.S.

21-15-115

. Education space capacity in excess of one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the standard space level shall not be included in actual gross square footage computations under this subdivision;

(1) and (2)

Repealed by Laws 2011, ch. 185, § 2.

Actual square footage of noneducation space shall not exceed ten percent (10%) of total gross square footage of education space as prescribed by the statewide building adequacy standards.

On and after July 1, 2014, and if not qualifying under subdivision (I) of this subparagraph, be approved by the state superintendent subject to the following:

(1)
Completion
of a formal evaluation of the school district's at-risk programs to
ensure provision of a continuum of learning supports and classroom
interventions addressing the needs of at-risk children within the
district which is comprised of the following:

a.
Criteria
for identifying at-risk students in accordance with and subject to
research-based indicators;

b.
Use of
individual learning plans for each identified at-risk student or an
equivalent school-wide plan that defines interventions, programs and
services required to address special needs. The plans shall be continuously
monitored by the district;

c.
Use of
quality learning supports and classroom interventions based upon the
special needs of the student population served by the district and
the supports and interventions are supported by and based upon research-based
practices and strategies;

d.
Data based
predictors to identify students at-risk of dropping out of school
after reaching the age of compulsory attendance pursuant to
W.S.

21-4-102

and learning
supports and classroom strategies to address this student population.

(2)
A formal
evaluation is conducted by the district not less than once every two
(2) years of the school's programs, comprised of the continuum of
learning supports and classroom interventions specified under subdivision
(IV)(1) of this subparagraph.
The evaluation shall measure the effectiveness
of the school's programs in meeting the needs of those student populations
attending the school.
Formal evaluations conducted under this subparagraph
shall be reported to and approved by the district board and reported
to the state superintendent together with action plans addressing
necessary program improvements;

(3)
Student
achievement within the school is reported annually by the district
to the state superintendent, as measured by quality indicators specified
by rule and regulation of the department which reflect the components
of the continuum of learning supports and classroom interventions
specified under subdivision (IV)(1) of this subparagraph;

(4)
Educational
space for the school is provided through facilities operated and maintained
by the district and approved by the school facilities department as
meeting statewide adequacy standards.
After two (2) evaluations by
the state superintendent under subdivision (IV)(3) of this subparagraph
that demonstrate academic progress or success of an alternative school's
educational program, the alternative school shall be included in the
district's five (5) year plan under
W.S.

21-15-116

and the school's
long-term facility needs shall be evaluated by the school facilities
department.
Notwithstanding subparagraph (m)(vi)(C) of this section,
the school facilities department shall not approve any district plan
which includes educational space for the alternative school within
a separate facility unless the district provides sufficient documentation
and evidence that the school cannot be collocated within a facility
containing educational space for another school with similar grade
configurations operated by the district.

Except for charter schools established under W.S.

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

and alternative schools approved under subdivision (v)(B)(IV) of this subsection, any alteration of the configuration of grades within a district, school or school facility which differs from the configuration of grades during the immediately preceding school year as reported under paragraph (iv) of this subsection shall be considered a reconfiguration and shall be documented by the district and reported to the state superintendent and the director of the state construction department. Following review and evaluation, the state superintendent and the director of the state construction department shall, each acting independently, approve or deny the reconfiguration for purposes of application to the education resource block grant model and the determination of school facility needs and remedies. The following shall apply:

Approval under this paragraph shall be based upon the appropriate delivery of the required educational program, the cost effectiveness of the proposed grade reconfiguration for delivery of adequate educational services to students with block grant resources, district wide capacity of school educational facilities as defined under W.S. 21-15-109(a)(ii) and any extraordinary circumstances related to the safe and efficient delivery of the education program to students;

Approval under this paragraph shall be required prior to receiving state funds for adding any new school within a district;

Effective for the school year commencing after July 1, 2012, and each school year thereafter, no reconfiguration of grades within any district, school or facility shall differ from the previous school year such that more than one (1) school is included within any one (1) school facility to be reported under paragraph (iv) of this subsection for purposes of determining the foundation program amount for that district;

As used in this paragraph, “configuration” means the approved combination of grades served within a district, school or school facility as reported for purposes of determining the foundation program amount for that district under this section.

Repealed by Laws 2002, ch. 76, § 3; Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

To the extent specifically provided by the legislature, and between periods of model recalibration required under subsection (t) of this section, the amount computed for each district under subsection (m) of this section shall be adjusted to provide for the effects of inflation, excluding those amounts specified under subparagraphs (m)(v)(E) and (F) of this section and the assessment component contained in paragraph (b)(xxviii) of “Attachment A” as referenced in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii). The adjustment under this subsection shall not be applied until the expiration of the school year immediately following the first school year of application of the recalibrated model, and shall be adjusted on a cumulative basis each school year thereafter and until the first school year of application of a subsequent model recalibration. Following analysis of information reported under subsection (u) of this section, the joint appropriations interim committee shall submit a recommendation to the legislature and the governor not later than November 1 of each applicable year on an external cost adjustment for purposes of this subsection.

and (ii) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Except as otherwise provided by law and following the computation and application of any adjustment under subsection (o) of this section, the amount computed for each school within each district shall be combined with the amount computed and provided on a district level for that district, as prescribed by the education resource block grant model, to determine the foundation program amount for each district.

through (s) Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2.

Not less than once every five (5) years, the legislature shall provide for the recalibration of the education resource block grant model to determine if modifications are necessary to ensure it remains cost-based in light of changing conditions and modifications to law.

To ensure model components specified under the education resource block grant model defined under W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv), as enumerated and enacted by the legislature and included in “Attachment A” referenced in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii), remain resourced at cost-based levels between periods of model recalibration required under subsection (t) of this section, and prior to adjustment for the effects of inflation for any school year under subsection (o) of this section, the joint education interim committee shall annually receive and review reports in accordance with this subsection and report to the joint appropriations interim committee as required by this subsection. The legislative service office shall assemble information necessary to develop a model monitoring process and other reports for the committee using data maintained by the department of education and other state agencies. For this purpose, the department shall annually update and compile information, in a format contained within reports provided during 2010 model recalibration, reported at the model component level, on school district allocation of model resources, as well as other information provided for purposes of developing and completing the 2010 cost of education studies. Each year excluding the first school year of application of any model recalibration performed under subsection (t) of this section, the information and analysis assembled by the legislative service office under this subsection shall be reported to the joint education interim committee in sufficient time to allow committee review of and deliberation on the report and the submission of recommendations to the joint appropriations interim committee by October 15 of the applicable school year. Report recommendations shall be used by the joint appropriations interim committee in its determination of legislative recommendation on model adjustment under subsection (o) of this section.

History.

Laws 1955, ch. 119, § 5; 1957, ch. 174, §§ 3, 4; W.S. 1957, § 21-67; Laws 1959, ch. 67, § 7; 1963, ch. 193, §§ 2, 3; 1965, ch. 190, § 3; 1967, ch. 161, § 1; 1969, ch. 111, § 232; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 21.1-232; Laws 1971, ch. 265, § 1; 1973, ch. 32, § 1; ch. 165, § 1; 1974, ch. 15, § 1; 1975, ch. 147, § 1; 1976, ch. 6, § 1; 1977, ch. 130, § 1; 1978, ch. 42, § 1; 1979, ch. 38, § 1; ch. 61, § 1; 1980, ch. 55, § 1; 1981, ch. 123, § 1; 1982, ch. 69, § 200; 1983, ch. 136, § 2; 1984, ch. 53, § 1; 1985, ch. 146, § 1; 1986, ch. 122, § 2; 1987, ch. 218, § 2; 1988, ch. 82, § 1; 1989, ch. 260, § 1; 1990, ch. 12, § 1; ch. 122, § 1; 1991, ch. 229, § 1; 1992, ch. 65, § 1; ch. 91, § 1; 1993, ch. 13, § 1; ch. 168, § 2; 1994, ch. 17, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, §§ 101, 303, 304; 1998, ch. 2, 102, 202, 401, 501, 701; ch. 30, § 308; 1999, ch. 110, §§ 101, 102, 106, 301; 2000, ch. 48, § 1; ch. 76, § 2; 2001, ch. 20, § 1; ch. 139, §§ 2, 323; ch. 190, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 76, §§ 2, 3; 2003, ch. 164, § 2; ch. 208, § 701; 2004, ch. 108, § 201; 2006, ch. 37, §§ 1, 2; ch. 114, § 1; 2007, ch. 147, §§ 101, 102; ch. 215, § 1; 2008, ch. 116, § 1; 2011, ch. 176, § 1; ch. 185, §§ 1, 2; 2012, ch. 99, §§ 1, 2; 2013 ch. 1, § 2, effective January 29, 2013; 2014 ch. 10, §§ 2, 3, effective March 4, 2014; 2015 ch. 30, § 1, effective February 25, 2015; 2016 ch. 105, § 3, effective July 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 31, § 1, effective February 17, 2017; 2017 ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2017 ch. 205, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2018 ch. 137, § 1, effective July 1, 2018; 2020 ch. 80, § 334, effective July 1, 2020; 2021 ch. 66, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references. —

As to state board of education, see §

21-2-301

.

As to the adjustment to the foundation program formula for special education, see §

21-13-321

.

As to a distance learning incentive in addition to the payment under this section, see §

21-13-330

.

As to cooperative service incentive in addition to the payment under this section, see §

21-13-331

.

As to career-vocational education program grants, see §

21-12-105

.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, in (m)(ii)(A), substituted “six thousand two hundred thirty dollars ($6,230.00)” for “six thousand two hundred thirty-eight dollars ($6,238.00)”; in (m)(ii)(B), substituted “six thousand two hundred one dollars ($6,201.00)” for “six thousand two hundred twenty-three dollars ($6,223.00)”; and, in (m)(ii)(C), substituted “six thousand five hundred twenty-four dollars ($6,524.00)” for “six thousand four hundred fifty-four dollars ($6,454.00).”

The 2006 amendments. —

The first 2006 amendment, by ch. 37, §§ 1 and 2, effective July 1, 2006, rewrote the section implementing 2005 recalibration modifications to the Wyoming education resource block grant model.

The second 2006 amendment, by ch. 114, § 1, in (n), added “and” at the end of (xi), and made a related change.

Laws 2006, ch. 114, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 24, 2006.

Pursuant to the conflicting legislation provision, this section is set out incorporating changes made by ch. 37, §§ 1 and 2.

The 2007 amendments. —

The first 2007 amendment, by ch. 147, § 1, deleted “be subject to subdivision (III) of this subparagraph and meet either subdivision (I) or (II) of this subparagraph” from the end of (m)(v)(B).

Laws 2007, ch. 147, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 28, 2007.

The second 2007 amendment, by ch. 215, § 1, in (o) deleted “and” preceding “adjusted on a cumulative.”

Laws 2007, ch. 215, § 5(b), makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 8, 2007.

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in the section as set out above.

The 2008 amendment,

in (m)(v), substituted “W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii) and (xviii)” for “W.S. 21-13-103(a)(xvii) and (xviii)”, substituted “W.S. 21-13-103(c)” for “W.S. 21-13-101(c)”.

Laws 2008, ch. 116, § 5, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2011 amendments. —

The first 2011 amendment, by ch. 176, § 1, substituted “21-13-101(a)(xiv)” for “21-13-103(a)(xiv)” in (m)(v).

Laws 2011, ch. 176 § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2011.

The second 2011 amendment, by ch. 185, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2011, substituted “each school year” for “school year 2006-2007” in (m)(iv)(B); substituted “immediately preceding” for “2005-2006” in (m)(iv)(B) and (m)(iv)(C); in (m)(iv)(C), deleted “After the 2006-2007 school year, and”; in the introductory language of (m)(v), substituted “21-13-101(a)(xiv)” for “21-13-103(a)(xiv),” and substituted “on file with the secretary of state and maintained by the state superintendent pursuant to W.S. 21-2-202(e)” for “and (xviii) and on file with the secretary of state pursuant to W.S. 21-13-101(c)”; in (m)(v)(C), added “adjusted under subsection (o) of this section”; in (m)(v)(D), substituted “Careeer-vocational” for “Vocational”; in (m)(v)(G)(II), substituted “one hundred fifteen percent (115%)” for “the following specified maximum percentage of,” repealed former (m)(v)(G)(II)(1) and (m)(v)(G)(II)(2), which read: “For school years 2006-2007 through 2008-2009, one hundred twenty-five percent (125%) of the standard space level; (2) For school year 2009-2010 and each school year thereafter, one hundred fifteen percent (115%) of the standard space level,” and made related changes; in (o), added “shall be adjusted to provide for the effects of inflation,” substituted “and the assessment component contained in paragraph (b)(xxviii) of ‘Attachment A’ as referenced in W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii)” for “shall be adjusted to provide for the effects of inflation,” and added “Following analysis of information reported under subsection (u) of this section”; and added (u).

While neither amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, repealed former (m)(iv)(C), which read: “Excluding charter schools established under W.S.

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

, any modification to the configuration of grades in which students are enrolled during any school year such that the configuration differs from that in which students were enrolled during the immediately preceding school year shall be documented by the district within reports submitted under this subsection and shall require approval by the state superintendent. Approval by the state superintendent under this subparagraph shall be based upon appropriate delivery of the required educational program, the cost effectiveness of the modified grade configuration for the delivery of adequate educational services to students and any extraordinary circumstances related to the safe and efficient delivery of the education program to students. This subparagraph relates only to the configuration of schools for application to the education resource block grant model and not to the authority of a district to configure grade levels at each of its schools”; added (m)(vi); and in (o), deleted “within the school foundation program budget as enacted” following “specifically provided” in the first sentence, and inserted “interim” preceding “committee.”

The 2013 amendment,

substituted “director” or similar language for “state superintendent” throughout (m); in (m)(vi) added “of the school facilities department”.

Laws 2013, ch. 1, § 6, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved January 29, 2013.

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “state superintendent” for “director” in the introductory language of (m), the introductory language of (m)(v), and (m)(v)(B)(III).

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 7, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 25, 2015.

The 2016 amendment,

effective July 1, 2016, in (m)(v)(B)(IV)(4) substituted “state construction” for “school facilities” wherever it occurred; and in (m)(vi), at the end of the first sentence of the introductory language, substituted “director of the state construction department” for “state superintendent of the school facilities director of the state construction department” and, in the second sentence, substituted “state construction” for “school facilities” preceding “department shall.”

The 2017 amendments. —

The first
2017 amendment, by ch. 31 § 1, added the end of the last sentence, which reads, “for a school district admitting a pupil from a nonunified school district in the state under
W.S.

21-4-501

and in the current school year for pupils attending a school in another state under
W.S.

21-4-505

.”

Laws 2017, ch. 31, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved Feb. 17, 2017.

The second
2017 amendment, by ch. 172, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (m)(vi) near the beginning of the last sentence substituted “state superintendent” for “director of the department of education.”

The third
2017 amendment, by ch. 205, § 1, effective July 1, 2017, in (m)(v) at the end of the first sentence deleted “on file with the secretary of state and maintained by the state superintendent pursuant to
W.S. 21-2-202(e);” at the beginning of (m)(v)(B)(IV) added “Except as otherwise provided in subdivision (V) of this subparagraph,” added (m)(v)(B)(V); toward the beginning of (m)(v)(C) substituted “under ‘Attachment A’” for “for school year 2005-2006;” and made a related change.

While neither amendment gave effect to the others, all have been given effect in this section as set out above.

The 2018 amendment,

effective July 1, 2018, in (m)(iv)(A), substituted “If the district's average ADM for the three (3) immediately preceding school years is greater than the district's ADM from the previous school year, each” for “The average daily membership (ADM) for each,” “years, otherwise each reported school within the district shall be computed based on the” for “years or the,” and deleted “whichever is greater” following “previous school year” at the end.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 1, 2020, in (m)(v)(F)(II) added “except as provided in subdivision (III) of this subparagraph” at the end; and added (m)(v)(F)(III) and made related changes.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2021, substituted "career and technical" for "career-vocational" and variants throughout (m)(v)(D); in (m)(v)(D)(II), substituted "career and technical" for "vocational" in the first sentence and twice in the second sentence; in (m)(v)(D)(III), substituted "career and technical" for "vocational" preceding "education courses" in the first sentence, and in the second sentence, substituted "career and technical" for "vocational" following "high school" twice.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2015, ch. 30, § 1, states in relevant part: “...in accordance with
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014)”. See discussion below.

Portions of
this section as amended by Senate Enrolled Act 1 (Laws 2013, ch. 1)
have been held unconstitutional.
Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15, 318 P.3d 300, 2014 Wyo.
LEXIS 16 (Wyo. 2014) and Powers v. State,
No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014). For the text of this
section prior to the 2013 enactment, see the 2011 edition and the
2012 supplement edition of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Laws 2014, ch. 10, § 2, amended portions
of subsection (m) of this section as that subsection existed prior
to the enactment of Laws 2013, ch. 1. Section 2 of the 2014 act superseded
alternative provisions in section 1 of that act and became effective
immediately upon the Governor's certification of the issuance of a
final court order as specified in section 3(b) of the act. The 2014
amendment is set out below.

Laws 2014, ch. 10, § 2 provides:

Section 2.

W.S. 21-13-309(m)(v)(B) by creating a new subparagraph (IV) and (vi)(intro),
as in effect prior to the enactment of 2013 Wyoming Session Laws,
Chapter 1, is amended to read:

21-13-309

.
Determination of amount to be included in
foundation program for each district.

(m)
In determining
the amount to be included in the foundation program for each district,
the state superintendent shall:

(v)
Based
upon ADM computations and identified school configurations within
each district pursuant to paragraph (iv) of this subsection, compute
the foundation program amount for each district as prescribed by the
education resource block grant model adopted by the Wyoming legislature
as defined under
W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xiv), as contained within the spreadsheets and accompanying
reports referenced under
W.S. 21-13-101(a)(xvii), on file with the secretary of state and maintained by
the state superintendent pursuant to
W.S. 21-2-202(e).
The following
criteria shall be used by the state superintendent in the administration
of the education resource block grant model:

(B)
Alternative
schools qualifying for separate consideration under the education
resource block grant model may be established by a school district
for offering educational programs to students with educational needs
which the district finds are not appropriately met by other schools
in the district, excluding charter schools established under
W.S.

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

.
Alternative schools
included within a district's configuration of schools identified under
paragraph (iv) of this subsection shall for purposes of the education
resource block grant model:

(vi)
Except
for charter schools established under
W.S.

21-3-301

through

21-3-314

and alternative
schools approved under subdivision (v)(B)(IV) of this subsection,
any alteration of the configuration of grades within a district, school
or school facility which differs from the configuration of grades
during the immediately preceding school year as reported under paragraph
(iv) of this subsection shall be considered a reconfiguration and
shall be documented by the district and reported to the state superintendent
and the director of the school facilities department.
Following review
and evaluation, the state superintendent and the director shall, each
acting independently, approve or deny the reconfiguration for purposes
of application to the education resource block grant model and the
determination of school facility needs and remedies. The following
shall apply:

Laws 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 201, provides: “In fulfilling its responsibility imposed by the Wyoming supreme court under Campbell County School District No. 1, et al., v. State of Wyoming, et al., (907 P.2d. 1238, Wyo., 1995), for establishing a school finance system which ensures each Wyoming student an opportunity to receive a proper education and which also assures the availability of adequate school buildings and facilities for the delivery of the proper education, the legislature directs activities and actions specified within this part [Part II of the act] in order to commence the implementation of the finance system and to assist continued development and final completion of this system.”

Laws 2006, ch. 37, § 2 purported to repeal subsection (n). Laws 2002, ch. 76, § 3 previously had repealed former subdivisions (iv) and (v) of subsection (n).

Laws 2006, ch. 37, Section 6, provides: “[HOLD HARMLESS]
